Texas, session 891, SB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 142A, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 142A.0003 to read as follows: Sec. 142A.0003.  RULES AND MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR DELIVERY OF CARE TO CERTAIN INFANTS. The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe minimum standards for the scope and delivery of supportive palliative care to an infant born with a lethal fetal anomaly or diagnosis. SECTION 2.  Section 170A.002, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b-1)  It is an exception to the application of Subsection (a) that the pregnant female's treating physician and one other physician specializing in obstetrics and gynecology determine the abortion is necessary due to a lethal fetal anomaly or diagnosis. SECTION 3.  Chapter 170A, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 170A.0025 to read as follows: Sec. 170A.0025.  MULTIDISCIPLINARY ETHICS COMMITTEE REVIEW OF CERTAIN ABORTIONS. (a) A multidisciplinary ethics committee composed of members appointed in accordance with rules the Texas Medical Board adopts shall review a physician's determination that an abortion is necessary under Section 170A.002(b-1) for each fetus older than 24 weeks of age. (b)  The treating physician and other physician who made the determination described by Subsection (a) may not be a member of the multidisciplinary ethics committee that reviews the determination. SECTION 4.  The heading to Section 171.205, Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 171.205.  EXCEPTIONS [EXCEPTION FOR MEDICAL EMERGENCY]; RECORDS; REVIEW. SECTION 5.  Section 171.205, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Subsection (a-1) to read as follows: (a-1)  Sections 171.203 and 171.204 do not apply to an abortion performed or induced by a physician in accordance with an exception provided by Section 170A.002. SECTION 6.  Section 171.206(b), Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  This subchapter may not be construed to: (1)  authorize the initiation of a cause of action against or the prosecution of a woman on whom an abortion is performed or induced or attempted to be performed or induced in violation of this subchapter; (2)  wholly or partly repeal, either expressly or by implication, any other statute that regulates or prohibits abortion[, including Chapter 6-1/2, Title 71, Revised Statutes]; or (3)  restrict a political subdivision from regulating or prohibiting abortion in a manner that is at least as stringent as the laws of this state. SECTION 7.  Section 171.207(b), Health and Safety Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  Subsection (a) may not be construed to: (1)  legalize the conduct prohibited by this subchapter [or by Chapter 6-1/2, Title 71, Revised Statutes]; (2)  limit in any way or affect the availability of a remedy established by Section 171.208; or (3)  limit the enforceability of any other laws that regulate or prohibit abortion. SECTION 8.  Chapter 6-1/2, Title 71, Revised Statutes, is repealed. SECTION 9.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.